Massachusetts, session 194th, S232.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 87SS of chapter 112, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place thereof the following
sentence:-
Every individual applicant for a license as a salesman who is required to take an
examination therefor shall, as a prerequisite to taking such examination, submit proof
satisfactory to the board that he has completed courses in real estate subjects approved by the
board, such courses to total 40 classroom hours of instruction and must include at least four
hours on fair housing law or diversity and inclusion in real estate; provided, however, that
applicants having successfully completed a course in real property while enrolled in an
accredited law school in the commonwealth may also take such examination.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 87XX1/2 of said chapter 112 is hereby amended by striking out the
first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
Any person holding a license as a real estate broker or salesman shall, within their
renewal period, satisfactorily complete courses or programs of instruction approved by the
board; provided that attendance at such courses or programs of instruction shall be no less than
six hours but no more than twelve hours as determined by the board. The curriculum contained
in such courses or programs shall contain at least six hours of instruction concerning or related to
compliance with laws and regulations including at least two hours on fair housing law or
diversity and inclusion in real estate and four hours selected from any of the following subjects:
fair housing; equal employment opportunity; accessibility for the disabled; agency law;
environmental issues in real estate; zoning and building codes; real estate appraisal and
financing; property tax assessments and valuation; and real estate board regulations.
of 2